Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1027.
do enact as follows:AB1027,1Section 1. 49.79 (1) (am) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:49.79 (1) (am) 2. Fifty Sixty-five years of age or older.AB1027,2Section 2. 49.79 (1) (am) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:49.79 (1) (am) 6. Exempt from the work requirement under the food stamp program, as described in 7 CFR 273.24 (c) (5) 7 USC 2015 (o) (3).AB1027,3Section 3. 49.79 (1) (ap) 4. and 5. of the statutes are amended to read:49.79 (1) (ap) 4. A parent of a household member who is younger than 18 14 years old, even if the household member who is younger than 18 14 years old is not eligible for food stamps.5. Residing in a household that includes a household member who is younger than 18 14 years old, even if the household member who is younger than 18 14 years old is not eligible for food stamps.AB1027,4Section 4. 49.79 (13) of the statutes is created to read:49.79 (13) Noncitizens ineligible for food stamp program. (a) No individual who is not a U.S. citizen or national of the United States may be eligible to receive food stamp benefits unless that individual meets the definition of an eligible alien pursuant to 7 USC 2015 (f) and is a qualified alien.(b) The department shall be required to verify that an individual is eligible for the food stamp program pursuant to 7 USC 2015 (f) and par. (a) during enrollment and eligibility recertification by verifying citizenship or eligible alien status using the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements online service or requiring the individual to provide an acceptable form of proof of citizenship or eligible alien status, including a certified birth certificate, U.S. passport, or U.S. customs and immigration services documentation.AB1027,5Section 5. 49.79 (14) of the statutes is created to read:49.79 (14) Data sharing with the U.S. department of agriculture. The department shall provide to the U.S. department of agriculture information regarding enrollment in the food stamp program, including the identity of individuals receiving benefits. The department shall provide the information at the frequency and in the format required by the food and nutrition service of the U.S. department of agriculture and in compliance with federal law.AB1027,6Section 6. Nonstatutory provisions.(1) Requirement to compile and share state SNAP data. As soon as possible, but no later than 6 months after the effective date of this subsection, the department of health services shall compile and share with the food and nutrition service of the federal department of agriculture all data required by the federal department of agriculture as set forth in the federal department of agriculture’s letter to state agency directors dated July 23, 2025, which is intended to implement the March 20, 2025, executive order 14243 issued by the president of the United States regarding individuals who, since January 1, 2020, have received, are currently receiving, or have applied to receive benefits under the federal food stamp program under s. 49.79.AB1027,7Section 7. Effective dates. This act takes effect on July 1, 2026, except as follows:(1) Section 6 of this act takes effect on the day after publication. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab1027 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab1027 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB1027 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB1027 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB1027: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting